Utah, session 2026, SB264.
Section 1. Section 20A-11-1203.5 is amended to read:20A-11-1203.5. Public official prohibited from expending public funds on certain communications.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), a public official may not make an expenditure from public funds for a billboard or mass communication that:(a)(i)includes a photograph, image, or likeness of the public official; or(ii)contains the name of the public official in a font size that is larger than any other font size on the billboard or mass communication; and(b)is posted, displayed, or mailed less than 60 calendar days before the date of any caucus, political convention, or election at which the public official is a candidate for elective office.(2)A public official may make an expenditure from public funds for a mass communication described in Subsection (1) if:(a)the mass communication is mailed to a person in response to that person making an inquiry of the public official;(b)the mass communication is sent to another public official;(c)the mass communication is a news release sent to a news media organization; or(d)the public official is legally required to mail the mass communication.; or(e)the mass communication:(i)is an informational newsletter or similar communication that a public entity regularly publishes outside the period described in Subsection (1)(b); and(ii)fails to comply with Subsection (1) solely because the mass communication includes a photograph of the public official as part of a candidate profile that:(A)is displayed in the same time, place, and manner as the profiles of all other candidates for the elective office for which the public official is a candidate; and(B)does not promote or oppose any individual's candidacy.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.